Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-4728.02
Commission; mental health specialist advisor; duties.

The commission shall appoint a mental health specialist advisor. The specialist shall monitor and provide advice to mental health, alcoholism, and drug abuse programs which provide treatment for deaf or hard of hearing persons. The specialist shall also serve as the commission's liaison to persons who provide treatment or intervention services for mental health, alcoholism, and drug abuse disorders which provide treatment for deaf or hard of hearing persons.

Laws 1995, LB 25, § 5;

Laws 1997, LB 851, § 20.